Hawaii statutes.
§302A-1155 Provisional attendance at
school. (a) A child may attend school provisionally upon submitting
written documentation from a licensed physician, physician assistant, advanced
practice registered nurse, or an authorized representative of the department of
health stating that the child is in the process of receiving the required
immunizations. Further documentation showing that the required immunizations
have been completed shall be submitted to the appropriate school official no
later than three months after the child first attends the school. If all of
the required immunizations cannot be completed within three months due to the
length of the minimum intervals between doses of a particular vaccine required
by the department of health, provisional attendance may be extended so long as
the child's parent or guardian provides documentation that appointments for
required immunizations have been made and that progress toward completing the
immunizations continues in accordance with the requirements of the department
of health.

(b) Provisional attendance at school may be
suspended by the department of health when there is danger of an epidemic from
any of the communicable diseases for which immunization is required. [L 1996, c
89, pt of §2; am L 1997, c 217, §1; am L 1998, c 60, §2; am L 2000, c 109, §2;
am L 2009, c 151, §8; am L 2014, c 16, §4 and c 232, §12]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next